Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.230

Quieting title to tax-title property—Appellate review.

Any person aggrieved by the judgment rendered in such action may seek appellate review of the part of said judgment objectionable to him or her in the manner and within the time prescribed for appeals in RCW 84.64.120.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4078; 1988 c 202 s 71; 1971 c 81 s 155; 1961 c 15 s 84.64.400. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 171 s 8; 1925 ex.s. c 130 s 121; RRS s 11308-8; prior: 1903 c 59 s 4; 1897 c 71 s 104; 1893 c 124 s 106. Formerly RCW 84.64.400.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.